Missouri, session 2026, HB2837.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 70.385, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 70.385, to read as follows:
70.385. [1. Two of the five appointments made by the governor pursuant to the
provisions of section 70.380 shall be selected from a panel of three nominees submitted by
the mayor of St. Louis City. Two of the five appointments made by the governor pursuant to
the provisions of section 70.380 shall be selected from a panel of three nominees submitted
by the county executive of St. Louis County.
2. The fifth appointment made by the governor pursuant to section 70.380 shall be
selected from a panel of three nominees submitted alternately by the mayor of St. Louis City
and the county executive of St. Louis County. The next appointment following August 28,
1997, shall be to fill the commissioner position described in this subsection and shall be made
from three nominees submitted by the county executive of St. Louis County. The next
appointment for the commissioner position described in this subsection shall be made from
three nominees submitted by the mayor of St. Louis City whereupon the order of nomination
and appointment for this position will repeat itself.
3. The order of the appointments made pursuant to subsection 1 of this section shall
be as follows:
(1) One from the panel of nominees submitted by the mayor of St. Louis city;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2837 2
(2) One from the panel of nominees submitted by the county executive of St. Louis
County whereupon the order of such appointments shall repeat itself.
4. Whenever the mayor or the county executive submits a panel of three nominees,
they shall adhere to the intent set forth in the provisions of subsection 2 of section 213.020.]
In case of any vacancy, the governor shall appoint a new commissioner of the bi-state
development agency under the provisions of section 70.380.
✔